Massachusetts, session 194th, S1701.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 111C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the definition of Commissioner and inserting
in place thereof the following definition:-
“Commissioner”, the commissioner of public safety.
and by striking out the definition of Department and inserting in place thereof the
following definition:-
"Department”, the department of public safety.
of 2

SECTION 2. Section 1 of chapter 111O of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by striking out the definition of Commissioner and inserting in place thereof the
following definition:-
“Commissioner”, the commissioner of public safety.
and by striking out the definition of Department and inserting in place thereof the
following definition:-
“Department”, the department of public safety.
of 2